Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-305 Rules. (a) The
commissioner shall adopt reasonable rules to establish minimum standards for
benefits and claims payment, marketing practices, compensation arrangements,
and reporting practices for medicare supplement policies and certificates.

(b) The commissioner may adopt from time to
time, reasonable rules as are necessary to conform medicare supplement policies
and certificates to the requirements of federal law and regulations adopted
thereunder, including but not limited to:

(1) Requiring refunds or credits if the policies or
certificates do not meet loss ratio requirements;

(2) Establishing a uniform methodology for
calculating and reporting loss ratios;

(3) Assuring public access to policies, premiums, and
loss ratio information of issuers of medicare supplement insurance;

(4) Establishing a process for approving or
disapproving policy forms and certificate forms and proposed premium increases;

(5) Establishing a policy for holding public hearings
prior to approval of premium increases; and

(6) Establishing standards for medicare select
policies and certificates. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 195, §27; am
L 1990, c 84, §4; am L 1992, c 195, §4; am L 1993, c 205, §23; am L 1996, c 28,
§3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next